Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-512
Life or annuity policy; form; withdrawal of approval; procedure; appeal.

After the expiration of such thirty days from the filing of any such form or at any time after having given written approval thereof, the director may, after a hearing of which at least ten days' written notice has been given to the insurer issuing such form, withdraw approval on any of the grounds stated in section 44-511. Such disapproval shall be effected by written order of the director which shall state the grounds for disapproval and the date, not less than thirty days after such hearing, when the withdrawal of approval shall become effective. The disapproval may be appealed, and the appeal shall be in accordance with the Administrative Procedure Act.

Laws 1963, c. 258, § 2, p. 782;

Laws 1969, c. 359, § 20, p. 1276;

Laws 1988, LB 352, § 50.

Administrative Procedure Act, see section 84-920.